tests/cases.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Case front-vowel final": 
    ийэ<n><nom> : ийэ
    ийэ<n><acc> : ийэни
    ийэ<n><par> : ийэтэ
    ийэ<n><dat> : ийэҕэ
    ийэ<n><abl> : ийэттэн
    ийэ<n><ins> : ийэнэн
    ийэ<n><com> : ийэлиин
    ийэ<n><comp> : ийэтээҕэр
    кинигэ<n><dat> : кинигэҕэ

  "Case back-vowel cons-final": 
    уот<n><nom> : уот
    уот<n><acc> : уоту
    уот<n><par> : уотта
    уот<n><dat> : уокка
    уот<n><abl> : уоттан
    уот<n><ins> : уотунан
    уот<n><com> : уоттуун
    уот<n><comp> : уоттааҕар

  "Case back-vowel cons-final 2": 
    ох<n><nom> : ох
    ох<n><acc> : оҕу
    ох<n><par> : охто
    ох<n><dat> : оххо
    ох<n><abl> : охтон
    ох<n><ins> : оҕунан
    ох<n><com> : охтуун
    ох<n><comp> : охтооҕор

  "дьахтар":
    дьахтар<n><nom> : дьахтар
    дьахтар<n><acc> : дьахтары
    дьахтар<n><par> : дьахтарда
    дьахтар<n><dat> : дьахтарга
    дьахтар<n><abl> : дьахтартан
    дьахтар<n><ins> : дьахтарынан
    дьахтар<n><com> : дьахтардыын
    дьахтар<n><comp> : дьахтардааҕар

    дьахтар<n><pl><nom> : дьахталлар
    дьахтар<n><pl><acc> : дьахталлары
    дьахтар<n><pl><par> : дьахталларда
    дьахтар<n><pl><dat> : дьахталларга
    дьахтар<n><pl><abl> : дьахталлартан
    дьахтар<n><pl><ins> : дьахталларынан
    дьахтар<n><pl><com> : дьахталлардыын
    дьахтар<n><pl><comp> : дьахталлардааҕар
